test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-s65_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - standa: # 
    standa+V+Inf: standa
    standa+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: stendur
    standa+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: stóð
    standa+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: stóðu
    standa+V+Sup: staðið
